Utah statutes.
77-18a-2.   Capital cases.

After the resolution of an initial appeal of a capital case when the sentence of death has been imposed, a subsequent appeal may not be entertained by any court and a stay of execution of the sentence may not be granted when the appeal does not raise any new matter not previously resolved or when the new matter could have been raised at the previous appeal.

